Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 3. Department Supervision.

Sec. 06.50.300.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The department may suspend or revoke a license under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) if the department finds that

the licensee has failed to pay the license fee, failed to maintain the required bond in effect, or failed to comply with a demand, ruling, or requirement of the department made under this chapter;

the licensee has violated a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted by the department under this chapter; or

a fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, clearly would have constituted ground for denial of the issuance of the license.

If the reason for suspension or revocation of a licensee’s license at one location applies generally to all locations operated by the licensee, the department may suspend or revoke all licenses issued to the licensee.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.310.
Reports to department.

On or before March 15 of each year, a licensee shall file with the department a composite annual report for the preceding calendar year in the form prescribed by the department relating to all advances made by the licensee. The department may require that the report be submitted under oath or affirmation, or with notice that false statements made are punishable as unsworn falsification in the second degree under AS

11.56.210

.

The report must include

the total number and dollar amount of advances made by the licensee;

the total number of individual customers who received advances;

the minimum, maximum, and average amount of advances;

the average annual percentage rate of the fee charged for advances;

the average number of days of the advances;

the total number and dollar amount of returned checks;

the total number and dollar amount of checks paid by advance recipients;

the total number and dollar amount of checks charged off as a loss;

the total dollar amount of outstanding advances as of the last day of the calendar year;

the total number of outstanding advances as of the last day of the calendar year; and

any other information the department determines is required to conduct its review.

Within 15 days after the occurrence of any of the following events, a licensee shall file a written report with the department describing the event and its expected effect on the activities of the licensee in the state:

filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

institution of suspension or revocation proceedings against the licensee by a state or other governmental authority;

a felony indictment or felony conviction of the licensee and, if the licensee is not a natural person, of a member, partner, director, senior officer, or holder of 10 percent or more of the licensee’s equity; and

other events that the department determines and identifies by regulation that may impair the ability of the licensee to operate its business under this chapter.

In the discretion of the department, the occurrence of an event in (c) of this section may constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of a license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For deferred deposit advances, see 3 AAC 11.

Sec. 06.50.320.
Records.

A licensee shall maintain all records relating to this chapter at the location for which the licensee has a license. The records must conform to generally accepted accounting principles and practices in a manner that will enable the department to determine whether the licensee is complying with the provisions of this chapter. The department shall have unrestricted access to the records of the licensee.

A licensee shall retain records relating to an advance for at least two years after the last entry on the advance, unless otherwise required by the department.

A licensee shall retain records of an advance that is the subject of a court action for at least two years after a judgment or settlement of the court action.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.330.
Examinations and investigations.

The department shall examine the business records of a licensee at intervals the department considers appropriate. In addition, for the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or securing information lawfully required, the department may, at any time, investigate the advances, business transactions, and records of a licensee. For these purposes, the licensee shall provide the department with unrestricted access to the offices, places of business, and records of the licensee. Within 30 days after the department requests payment, the licensee shall pay the department the cost of examination at a rate of $75 an hour for each examiner.

For the purposes of this section, the department may administer oaths or affirmations and, upon its own motion or upon request of a party, may subpoena witnesses, compel the attendance of witnesses, take evidence, and require the production of material that is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition, and location of books, documents, and other tangible items, and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts, or other material reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

Upon failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony, and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected by the failure, the department may apply to the superior court for an order compelling compliance.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)